Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2122
Utilities district; gas mains and service lines; extension.

In addition to any other rights and powers conferred upon metropolitan utilities districts under sections 14-2101 to 14-2157 and Chapter 18, article 4, for the purpose of extending gas mains and service pipes, such districts shall have the power and authority to extend or enlarge gas mains and service pipes whenever it is deemed proper and economically feasible to do so in such nondiscriminatory manner as may be determined from time to time by the board of directors of such districts.

Laws 1957, c. 20, § 1, p. 152;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1103.01;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 22.